Utah statutes.
54-14-201.   Conditions on siting of facilities by local governments -- Payment of actual excess costs.

If otherwise authorized by law, a local government may require or condition the construction of a facility in any manner if:

(1)  the requirements or conditions do not impair the ability of the public utility to provide safe, reliable, and adequate service to its customers; and

(2)  the local government pays for the actual excess cost resulting from the requirements or conditions, except:

(a)  any actual excess costs that the public utility collects from its customers pursuant to an order, rule, or regulation of the commission; or

(b)  any portion of the actual excess costs that the board requires to be borne by the public utility.

